Utah statutes.
63G-6-804 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Debarment from consideration for award of contracts -- Causes for debarment.

(1)  After reasonable notice to the person involved and reasonable opportunity for that person to be heard, the chief procurement officer or the head of a purchasing agency, after consultation with the using agency and the attorney general, shall have authority to debar a person for cause from consideration for award of contracts.  The debarment shall not be for a period exceeding three years.  The same officer, after consultation with the using agency and the attorney general, shall have authority to suspend a person from consideration for award of contracts if there is probable cause to believe that the person has engaged in any activity which might lead to debarment.  The suspension shall not be for a period exceeding three months unless an indictment has been issued for an offense which would be a cause for debarment under Subsection (2), in which case the suspension shall, at the request of the attorney general, remain in effect until after the trial of the suspended person.

(2)  The causes for debarment include the following:

(a)  conviction of a criminal offense as an incident to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or subcontract or in the performance of such contract or subcontract;

(b)  conviction under state or federal statutes of embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records, receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicating a lack of business integrity or business honesty which currently, seriously, and directly affects responsibility as a state contractor;

(c)  conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes;

(d)  failure without good cause to perform in accordance with the terms of the contract; or

(e)  any other cause the chief procurement officer, or the head of a purchasing agency determines to be so serious and compelling as to affect responsibility as a state contractor, including debarment by another governmental entity for any cause listed in rules and regulations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

